Massachusetts, session 194th, H2335.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law or local law to the contrary, any
member of the regular police or fire departments and fire alarm or wires division of the City of
Newton shall, within nine months of appointment, reside within the City of Newton or within
thirty-five miles of Newton's city limits, or within such distance of Newton's city limits as set
under a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 150E. Said distance shall be
measured from the closest Newton border limits to the closest border limits of the city or town in
which said member resides.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1